Nebraska, session 109, LB377.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 37-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-101 (1)(a) The Game and Parks Commission shall consist of nine members,
one from each of the eight districts provided for by section 37-102 and one at-
large member, and shall be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a
majority of all members of the Legislature.
(b) Members of the commission shall be legal residents and citizens of
Nebraska and shall be well informed and interested in matters under the
jurisdiction of the commission.
(c) At least three members of the commission shall be actually engaged in
agricultural pursuits.
(d) Not more than five of the members of the commission shall be
affiliated with the same political party. The political party affiliation of
each prospective member shall be determined as of the statewide general
election prior to his or her appointment.
(e) Members of the commission representing districts provided for by
section 37-102 shall be bona fide residents of the district from which they are
appointed.
(f) When a member ceases to be a member of the political party determined
under subdivision (d) of this subsection, ceases to be a bona fide resident of
the district, or ceases to be actually engaged in agricultural pursuits if
required to meet the qualifications for his or her appointment, the office
shall be immediately vacated.
(2)(a) When the term of a member of the commission representing a district
provided for by section 37-102 expires, a successor shall be appointed as
provided in subsection (1) of this section from the same district as the member
whose term has expired. The terms of the members serving district numbers 4, 6,
and 8 on January 1, 2009, shall be extended to January 15 of the year following
the expiration of their current terms. Members appointed for terms expiring
prior to January 1, 2012, shall be appointed for five-year terms. Members
appointed for terms expiring on or after January 1, 2012, shall be appointed
for four-year terms. The terms of all members shall begin on January 15 , and
the term of the at-large member shall begin January 15, 2009.
(b) Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his
or her successor. In case of a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the
term of a member, the appointment shall be made only for the remainder of the
term. An appointment made for the remainder of the term shall not be considered
a full term.
(c) No person who has served three two full terms shall be eligible for
reappointment as a member of the commission.
(3) If the Legislature is not in session when members of the commission
are appointed by the Governor, they shall take office and act as recess
appointees until the Legislature next thereafter convenes.
(4) Members may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of
duty, or misconduct in office, but only after delivering to the member a copy
of the charges and affording an opportunity of being publicly heard in person
or by counsel in his or her own defense, upon not less than ten days' notice.
Such hearing shall be held before the Governor.
If such member is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the
Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges made against such member
and his or her findings thereon, together with a complete record of the
proceedings.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-